lexc-files/prs-num/subordinative.txt
!===============================
LEXICON IntrSubr
!  person/number markers for
!    intransitive subordinative 
!===============================
!--------------------|----------------------|----------------------|
^[4Sg]:^ni   Enclitic; ^[1Sg]:^nga  Enclitic; ^[2Sg]:^ten^ Enclitic; ! a bit hacky...
^[4Pl]:^teng Enclitic; ^[1Pl]:^ta   Enclitic; ^[2Pl]:^si   Enclitic; ! not sure how else to differentiate
^[4Du]:^tek  Enclitic; ^[1Du]:^tung Enclitic; ^[2Du]:^tek  Enclitic; ! between "ten" (2SG) and "teng" (4PL)
!--------------------|----------------------|----------------------|

!=============================
LEXICON TrnsSubr
!  person/number markers for
!    transitive subordinative 
!=============================
|----------------------|----------------------|------------------------|
^[_.3Sg]:^ku   Enclitic; ^[_.3Pl]:^ki Enclitic; ^[_.3Du]:^kek  Enclitic;
^[_.1Sg]:^nga  Enclitic; ^[_.1Pl]:^ta Enclitic; ^[_.1Du]:^tung Enclitic;
^[_.2Sg]:^ten^ Enclitic; ^[_.2Pl]:^si Enclitic; ^[_.2Du]:^tek  Enclitic;
|----------------------|----------------------|------------------------|
